Wisconsin, session 2025, AB621.
do enact as follows:AB621,14Section 1. 118.60 (2) (a) 10. of the statutes is created to read:AB621,2,21118.60 (2) (a) 10. The private school is not a virtual school, as defined in s. 2118.076 (4) (a).AB621,23Section 2. 119.23 (2) (a) 10. of the statutes is created to read:AB621,2,54119.23 (2) (a) 10. The private school is not a virtual school, as defined in s. 5118.076 (4) (a).AB621,36Section 3. Initial applicability.AB621,2,87(1) This act first applies to private schools participating in a program under s. 8118.60 or 119.23 in the 2026-27 school year.AB621,2,99